Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.110

Burden of persuasion.

If the prosecution relies on an exception in RCW 10.122.050 through 10.122.100 to justify a failure to record electronically a custodial interrogation, the prosecution must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the exception applies.

[ 2021 c 329 s 11.]